Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8558.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-2-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-2 entitled "General
Powers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-2-6. Lands given for specific use not subject to disposal.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing Nothing in § 45-2-5 shall
be construed to authorize the sale, lease, or conveyance of lands or improvements acquired by gift
or devise for the public use, whether or not the gift or devise is subject to a condition subsequent
or reverter; and no property held by any city or town as part of a charitable trust shall be considered
to come within the provisions of § 45-2-5.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the city of Warwick may sell, convey,
or grant, for consideration or otherwise, the parcel of real estate located at 34 Warwick Lake
Avenue, identified on the Warwick tax assessor's maps as Plat 328, Lot 261, in fee simple absolute
or otherwise, pursuant to the procedures set forth in § 45-2-5, all restrictions of record having
already expired pursuant to § 34-4-24.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006472/SUB A
========